Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 7

Continuances

20-7-101. Grounds — Timing.

Continuances are regulated by this chapter, and may always be granted by the court, upon good cause shown, in any stage of the action.

Code 1858, § 4245 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 26); Shan., § 6083; mod. Code 1932, § 10341; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1101.

Cross-References. Arbitration, §29-5-107.

Circuit courts, absence of judge, §16-10-207.

Clerk's fee, §8-21-401.

Court of Criminal Appeals, Tenn. R. Crim. App. 7, 15.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-40-3.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure (Michael R. Tilley), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Comparative Legislation. Continuances:

Ark. Code §16-63-401 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §9-10-150 et seq.; §17-8-20 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 453.020, 453.070.

Miss. Code Ann. §§9-1-9.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 510.080 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 1A-1, Rule 40.

Va. Code §§ 17-25, 17-26.

Cited: Dendy v. Dendy, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 44 (Tenn. Ct. App. Jan. 20, 2012); Dendy v. Dendy, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 168 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 5, 2012).

20-7-102. Consent of parties.

Any cause may be continued by mutual consent of the parties when approved by the court, or on sufficient cause shown by affidavit.

Acts 1933, ch. 137, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8790.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Cited: Dendy v. Dendy, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 168 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 5, 2012).

20-7-103. Terms on which granted.

The court, in so entering or in granting continuances, may impose terms upon the party at whose instance the cause has been continued, by making the party pay costs, or otherwise, as may best further the progress of the cause and the ends of justice.

Code 1858, § 2942 (deriv. Acts 1779 (Apr.), ch. 4, § 5); Shan., § 4663; Code 1932, § 8791; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Continuances, § 16.

20-7-104. Judgment for costs.

If a continuance is granted on payment of costs, the court shall enter judgment and award execution for the costs.

Code 1858, § 2943 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 33, § 4); Shan., § 4664; Code 1932, § 8792; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1104.

20-7-105. Death of party during continuance.

The death of a party shall not prevent a trial at the term at which the cause is revived.

Code 1858, § 2944; Shan., § 4665; mod. Code 1932, § 8793; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1105.

20-7-106. Member of general assembly as attorney, party or witness in case.

Upon the motion of a member of the general assembly qualified to make such motion under this section, or the member's attorney or representative, any court, constituted under the laws of this state, any administrative board or commission or other agency authorized to conduct hearings shall grant a continuance or postponement of the proceedings, at any stage of the action, if it is shown that an attorney, party or material witness is a member of the general assembly and that:

The general assembly is in annual regular session or special session; or

The attorney, party or material witness would be required to be absent from any meeting of a legislative committee while the general assembly is not in session if a continuance is not granted.

Acts 1971, ch. 333, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-1106; Acts 1981, ch. 62, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.90.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure (Michael R. Tilley), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

Attorney General Opinions. The department of labor is not prevented by T.C.A. §20-7-106 from scheduling a benefit review conference on a case where the attorney is a legislator and the general assembly is in session, OAG 02-134 (12/19/02).